District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.04d

Bicyclists’ use of leading pedestrian intervals.

(a)

A bicyclist may cross at an intersection while following the pedestrian traffic control signal for the bicyclist’s direction of travel unless otherwise directed by traffic signs or traffic control devices.

(b)

A bicyclist may cross an intersection where a leading pedestrian interval is used.

History

Mar. 3, 1925, ch. 443, § 9d
as added Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-49, § 2(b), 60 DCR 15148

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-49 added this section.